Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act
19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 2354.

§79-11-189.
Expulsion or suspension of member or termination or suspension of membership.

No member may be expelled or suspended, and no membership or memberships may be terminated or suspended except pursuant to a procedure which is fair and reasonable and is carried out in good faith.

A procedure is fair and reasonable when either:

The articles or bylaws set forth a procedure which provides:

Not less than fifteen (15) days prior written notice of the expulsion, suspension or termination and the reasons therefore; and

An opportunity for the member to be heard, orally or in writing, not less than five (5) days before the effective date of the expulsion, suspension or termination by a person or persons authorized to decide that the proposed expulsion, termination or suspension not take place; or

It is fair and reasonable taking into consideration all of the relevant facts and circumstances.

Any written notice given by mail must be given by first-class or certified mail sent to the last address of the member shown on the corporation’s records.

Any proceeding challenging an expulsion, suspension or termination, including a proceeding in which defective notice is alleged, must be commenced within one (1) year after the effective date of the expulsion, suspension or termination.

A member who has been expelled or suspended may be liable to the corporation for dues, assessments or fees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 45, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

Suspension or expulsion from professional association and the remedies therefor. 20 A.L.R.2d 531.

Right to damages for exclusion from membership in social or fraternal organization. 59 A.L.R.2d 1290.

Exclusion or expulsion from association or club as violation of state civil rights act. 38 A.L.R.4th 628.

What constitutes private club or association not otherwise open to public that is exempt from state civil rights statute. 83 A.L.R.5th 467.

§79-11-191.
Purchase by corporation of membership of member who resigns or whose membership is terminated.

A corporation may purchase the membership of a member who resigns or whose membership is terminated for the amount and pursuant to the conditions set forth in or authorized by its articles or bylaws. No payment shall be made in violation of Section 79-11-293.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 46, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Conditions for corporation to purchase memberships, see § 79-11-293.

§79-11-193.
Proceedings brought on behalf of domestic or foreign corporation.

A proceeding may be brought in the right of a domestic or foreign corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by:

Any member or members having five percent (5%) or more of the voting power or by fifty (50) members, whichever is less; or

Any director.

In any such proceeding, each complainant shall be a member or director at the time of bringing the proceeding.

A complaint in a proceeding brought in the right of a corporation must be verified and allege with particularity the demand made, if any, to obtain action by the directors and either why the complainants could not obtain the action or why they did not make the demand. If a demand for action was made and the corporation’s investigation of the demand is in progress when the proceeding is filed, the court may stay the suit until the investigation is completed.

On termination of the proceeding the court may require the complainants to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses (including counsel fees) incurred in defending the suit if it finds that the proceeding was commenced frivolously or in bad faith.

If the proceeding on behalf of the corporation results in the corporation taking some action requested by the complainants or otherwise was successful, in whole or in part, or if anything was received by the complainants as the result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of an action or claim, the court may award the complainants reasonable expenses (including counsel fees).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 47, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

A demand requires some meaningful opportunity for the directors to act after learning of a threat of suit on the issue. Longanecker v. Diamondhead Country Club, 760 So. 2d 764, 2000 Miss. LEXIS 148 (Miss. 2000).

Substantial evidence supported the determination that the plaintiffs failed to make demand upon the defendant association as one plaintiff even admitted in his testimony that no written demand was ever made on the association. Longanecker v. Diamondhead Country Club, 760 So. 2d 764, 2000 Miss. LEXIS 148 (Miss. 2000).

Neither party was entitled to attorney fees because a developer did not breach any portion of the subdivision covenants, and the homeowners’ lawsuit was neither frivolous, brought in bad faith, without reasonable cause, nor for an improper purpose, and they succeeded in obtaining a judgment in their favor as to one issue—that the developer was an owner of its residential lots. Heckenberger v. Livingston Dev. Corp., 282 So.3d 1252, 2019 Miss. App. LEXIS 488 (Miss. Ct. App. 2019).

Allowance of punitive damages in stockholder’s derivative action.
67 A.L.R.3d 350.

Negligence, nonfeasance, or ratification of wrongdoing as excusing demand on directors as prerequisite to bringing of stockholder’s derivative suit on behalf of corporation.
99 A.L.R.3d 1034.

Propriety of termination of properly initiated derivative action by “independent committee” appointed by board of directors whose actions (or inaction) are under attack.
22 A.L.R.4th 1206.

19 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1867, 1874 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 21 et seq.

Pleading and verification requirements in stockholders’ derivative suits in federal courts. 15 L. Ed. 2d 1120.

§79-11-195.
Delegates.

A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for delegates having some or all of the authority of members.

The articles or bylaws may set forth provisions relating to:

The characteristics, qualifications, rights, limitations and obligations of delegates including their selection and removal;

Calling, noticing, holding and conducting meetings of delegates; and

Carrying on corporate activities during and between meetings of delegates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 48, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

As to petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

§79-11-197.
Annual membership meeting.

A corporation with members shall hold a membership meeting annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

Annual membership meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

At the annual meeting:

The president and chief financial officer shall report on the activities and financial condition of the corporation; and

The members shall consider and act upon such other matters as may be raised consistent with the requirements of Sections 79-11-205 and 79-11-219.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation’s bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that an annual or regular meeting of members does not need to be held at a geographic location if the meeting is held by means of the Internet or other electronic communications technology in a fashion pursuant to which the members have the opportunity to read or hear the proceedings substantially concurrently with their occurrence, vote on matters submitted to the members, pose questions, and make comments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 49; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 6, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added (5).

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 797, 829.

§79-11-199.
Special meetings of members.

A corporation with members shall hold a special meeting of members:

On call of its board or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles or bylaws; or

If the holders of at least five percent (5%) of the voting power sign, date and deliver to any corporate officer one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

The close of business on the thirtieth day before delivery of the demand for a special meeting to any corporate officer is the record date for the purpose of determining whether the five percent (5%) requirement of subsection (1) of this section has been met.

If a notice for a special meeting demanded under subsection (1)(b) of this section is not given pursuant to Section 79-11-205 within thirty (30) days after the date the written demand or demands are delivered to a corporate officer, regardless of the requirements of subsection (4) of this section, a person signing the demand or demands may set the time and place of the meeting and give notice pursuant to Section 79-11-205.

Special meetings of members may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

Only those matters that are within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by Section 79-11-205 may be conducted at a special meeting of members.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may provide that a special meeting of members does not need to be held at a geographic location if the meeting is held by means of the Internet or other electronic communications technology in a fashion pursuant to which the members have the opportunity to read or hear the proceedings substantially concurrently with their occurrence, vote on matters submitted to the members, pose questions, and make comments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 50; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 7, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added (6).

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to requirements for a court-ordered meeting of members, see § 79-11-201.

§79-11-201.
Court-ordered meeting of members.

The chancery court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is or will be located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may summarily order a meeting to be held:

On application of any member or other person entitled to participate in the annual meeting, if an annual meeting was not held within the earlier of six (6) months after the end of the corporation’s fiscal year or fifteen (15) months after its last annual meeting; or

On application of a member who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under Section 79-11-199, or a person or persons entitled to call a special meeting, if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty (30) days after the date the demand was delivered to a corporate officer; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, specify a record date for determining members entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting (or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters), and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

If the court orders a meeting, it may also order the corporation to pay the member’s cost (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 51; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 57, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “principal office is or will be located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may summarily” for “principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may summarily” in (1).

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to requirements for approval of corporate action by members without holding a meeting of members, see § 79-11-203.

Attorneys’ fees: cost of services provided by paralegals or the like as compensable element of award in state court.
73 A.L.R.4th 938.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Form 297.

§79-11-203.
Approval of action by members without holding meeting of members.

Unless limited or prohibited by the articles or bylaws, action required or permitted by Section 79-11-101 et seq. to be approved by the members may be approved without a meeting of members if the action is approved by members holding at least eighty percent (80%) of the voting power. The action must be evidenced by one or more consents in the form of a record bearing the date of signature and describing the action taken, signed by those members representing at least eighty percent (80%) of the voting power, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

If not otherwise determined under Section 79-11-201 or 79-11-209, the record date for determining members entitled to take action without a meeting is the date the first member signed the consent under subsection (1) of this section.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document filed with the Secretary of State.

Written notice of member approval pursuant to this section shall be given to all members who have not signed the written consent. If written notice is required, member approval pursuant to this section shall be effective ten (10) days after such written notice is given.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 52; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 8, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (1) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, inserted “in the form of a record bearing the date of signature and” following “The action must be evidenced by one or more consents” in the second sentence in (1).

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

§79-11-205.
Notice of meetings of members; notice of adjourned meetings.

A corporation shall give notice consistent with its bylaws of meetings of members in a fair and reasonable manner.

Any notice which conforms to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section is fair and reasonable, but other means of giving notice may also be fair and reasonable when all the circumstances are considered.

Notice is fair and reasonable if:

The corporation notifies its members of the place, date and time of each annual and special meeting of members no fewer than ten (10) (or if notice is mailed by other than first-class or registered mail, thirty (30)) nor more than sixty (60) days before the meeting date;

Notice of an annual meeting includes a description of any matter or matters which must be approved by the members under Sections 79-11-269, 79-11-281, 79-11-301, 79-11-315, 79-11-323, 79-11-331, 79-11-333 or 79-11-335; and

Notice of a special meeting includes a description of the matter or matters for which the meeting is called.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special meeting of members is adjourned to a different date, time or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time or place, if the new date, time or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under Section 79-11-209, however, notice of the adjourned meeting must be given under this section to the members of record as of the new record date.

When giving notice of an annual or special meeting of members, a corporation shall give notice of a matter a member intends to raise at the meeting if:

requested in writing to do so by a person entitled to call a special meeting; and

the request is received by the secretary or president of the corporation at least ten (10) days before the corporation gives notice of the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 53, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Notice requirements in general, see § 79-11-129.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to matters which may be considered by and acted upon by members of corporation at annual meeting, see § 79-11-197.

Applicability of this section to requirements for holding of special meeting of members of corporation, see § 79-11-199.

Applicability of this section to restatement of corporation’s articles of incorporation, see § 79-11-307.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for meeting of members to approve amendments to bylaws, see § 79-11-315.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for meeting of members to approve plan of merger, see § 79-11-321.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for meeting of members to approve the sale or other disposition of a corporation’s property not in the usual course of business, see § 79-11-331.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for meeting of members to approve dissolution of corporation, see § 79-11-335.

§79-11-207.
Waiver of notice requirements by member.

A member may waive any notice required by Section 79-11-101 et seq., the articles or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver must be in writing, be signed by the member entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A member’s attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the member at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting;

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the member objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 54, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (1) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

§79-11-209.
Record date.

The bylaws of a corporation may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to notice of a members’ meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix a future date as such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which notice is given or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the business day preceding the day on which the meeting is held are entitled to notice of the meeting.

The bylaws of a corporation may fix or provide the manner of fixing a date as the record date for determining the members entitled to vote at a members’ meeting. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix a future date as such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members on the date of the meeting who are otherwise eligible to vote are entitled to vote at the meeting.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner for determining a date as the record date for the purpose of determining the members entitled to exercise any rights in respect of any other lawful action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing such a record date, the board may fix in advance such a record date. If no such record date is fixed, members at the close of business on the day on which the board adopts the resolution relating thereto, or the sixtieth day prior to the date of such other action, whichever is later, are entitled to exercise such rights.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than seventy (70) days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of members occurs.

A determination of members entitled to notice of or to vote at a membership meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board fixes a new date for determining the right to notice or the right to vote, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than seventy (70) days after the record date for determining members entitled to notice of the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date for notice or voting continues in effect or it may fix a new record date for notice of voting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 55, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Applicability of this section to definition of “record date” for purposes of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-127.

Applicability of this section to the requirements for approval of corporate action by members without holding a meeting of members, see § 79-11-203.

Applicability of this section to the requirement of notice of adjourned meetings of members, see § 79-11-205.

§79-11-211.
Corporate action taken by ballot without meeting.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and unless prohibited or limited by the articles or bylaws, any action which may be taken at any annual or special meeting of members may be taken without a meeting if the corporation delivers a written ballot to every member entitled to vote on the matter.

A ballot shall:

Be in the form of a record;

Set forth each proposed action; and

Provide an opportunity to vote for or against each proposed action.

Approval by written ballot pursuant to this section shall be valid only when the number of votes cast by ballot equals or exceeds the quorum required to be present at a meeting authorizing the action, and the number of approvals equals or exceeds the number of votes that would be required to approve the matter at a meeting at which the total number of votes cast was the same as the number of votes cast by ballot.

All solicitations for votes by written ballot shall:

Indicate the number of responses needed to meet the quorum requirements;

State the percentage of approvals necessary to approve each matter other than election of directors; and

Specify the time by which a ballot must be received by the corporation in order to be counted.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, a written ballot may not be revoked.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 56; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 9, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, deleted “written” preceding “ballot shall” in (2); and redesignated former (2)(a) and (b) as (2)(b) and (c).

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

§79-11-213.
Preparation of list of members entitled to notice of meeting and members entitled to vote at meeting; list to be open for inspection; court may order inspection and copying of lists.

After fixing a record date for a notice of a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its members who are entitled to notice of the meeting. The list must show the address and number of votes each member is entitled to vote at the meeting. The corporation shall prepare on a current basis through the time of the membership meeting a list of members, if any, who are entitled to vote at the meeting, but not entitled to notice of the meeting. This list shall be prepared on the same basis and be part of the list of members.

The list of members must be available for inspection by any member for the purpose of communication with other members concerning the meeting, beginning two (2) business days after notice is given of the meeting for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation’s principal office or at a reasonable place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A member, a member’s agent, or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the limitations of Sections 79-11-285(c) and 79-11-291, to copy the list, at a reasonable time and at the member’s expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the list of members available at the meeting, and any member, a member’s agent, or attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a member, a member’s agent, or attorney to inspect the list of members before or at the meeting (or copy the list as permitted by subsection (2) of this section); the chancery court of the county where a corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, on application of the member, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete and may order the corporation to pay the member’s costs (including reasonable counsel fees) incurred to obtain the order.

Unless a written demand to inspect and copy a membership list has been made under subsection (2) of this section prior to the membership meeting and a corporation improperly refuses to comply with the demand, refusal or failure to comply with this section does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 57; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 58, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, on application of the member, may summarily” for “principal office (or if none in this state, its registered office) is located, on application of the member, may summarily” in (4).

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-403.

Right of member of nonprofit association or corporation to possession, inspection, or use of membership lists. 37 A.L.R.4th 1206.

§79-11-215.
Each member to have one vote.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, each member is entitled to one (1) vote on each matter voted on by the members.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, if a membership stands of record in the names of two (2) or more persons, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect:

If only one (1) votes, such act binds all; and

If more than one (1) votes, the vote shall be divided on a pro rata basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 58, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1025.

§79-11-217.
Quorum requirements.

Unless Section 79-11-101 et seq., the articles, or the bylaws provide for a higher or lower quorum, ten percent (10%) of the votes entitled to be cast on a matter must be represented at a meeting of members to constitute a quorum on that matter.

A bylaw amendment to decrease the quorum for any member action may be approved by the members, or, unless prohibited by the bylaws, by the board.

A bylaw amendment to increase the quorum required for any member action must be approved by the members.

Unless one-third (1/3) or more of the voting power is present in person or by proxy, the only matters that may be voted upon at an annual meeting of members are those matters that are described in the meeting notice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 59, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (1) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

§79-11-219.
Votes required for member action.

Unless Section 79-11-101 et seq., the articles, or the bylaws require a greater vote or voting by class, if a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of the votes represented and voting (which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum) is the act of the members.

A bylaw amendment to increase or decrease the vote required for any member action must be approved by the members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 60, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (1) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meetings of members, delegates or directors, or for obtaining their consent, see § 79-11-131.

Applicability of this section to matters which may be considered by and acted upon by members of corporation at annual meeting, see § 79-11-197.

§79-11-221.
Voting by proxy.

Unless the articles or bylaws prohibit or limit proxy voting, a member may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for the member by signing an appointment form either personally or by an attorney-in-fact in the form of a record.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for eleven (11) months unless a different period is expressly provided in the appointment form; provided, however, that no proxy shall be valid for more than three (3) years from its date of execution.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the member.

The death or incapacity of the member appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises authority under the appointment.

Appointment of a proxy is revoked by the person appointing the proxy:

Attending any meeting and voting in person; or

Signing and delivering to the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate proxy votes either a writing in the form of a record stating that the appointment of the proxy is revoked or a subsequent appointment form.

Subject to Section 79-11-227 and any express limitation on the proxy’s authority appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the member making the appointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 61; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 10, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, inserted “in the form of a record” at the end of (1) and in (5)(b).

3 Am. Jur. 2d, Agency § 172.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 904.

§79-11-223.
Cumulative voting.

If the articles or bylaws provide for cumulative voting by members, members may so vote, by multiplying the number of votes the members are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote, and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two (2) or more candidates.

Cumulative voting is not authorized at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or statement accompanying the notice states that cumulative voting will take place; or

A member gives notice during the meeting and before the vote is taken of the member’s intent to cumulate votes, and if one (1) member gives this notice all other members participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

A director elected by cumulative voting may be removed by the members without cause if the requirements of Section 79-11-245 are met and the votes cast against removal, or not consenting in writing to such removal, would be sufficient to elect such director if voted cumulatively at an election at which the same total number of votes were cast (or, if such action is taken by written ballot, all memberships entitled to vote were voted) and the entire number of directors authorized at the time of the director’s most recent election were then being elected.

Members may not cumulatively vote if the directors and members are identical.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 62, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-225.
Method of election of directors.

A corporation may provide in its articles or bylaws for election of directors by members or delegates: (a) on the basis of chapter or other organization unit; (b) by region or other geographic unit; (c) by preferential voting; or (d) by any other reasonable method.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 63, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-227.
Acceptance or rejection of vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member if:

The member is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian or conservator representing the member and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the member, and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the member and if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign for the member has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment; or

Two (2) or more persons hold the membership as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one (1) of the co-holders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-holders.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the member.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages to the member for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 64, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Applicability of this section to acceptance by a corporation of a proxy’s votes or other action, see § 79-11-221.

§79-11-229.
Voting agreements between members.

Two (2) or more members may provide for the manner in which they will vote by signing an agreement for that purpose. Such agreements may be valid for a period of up to ten (10) years.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 65, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-231.
Board of directors; persons authorized to exercise some or all of powers of board.

Each corporation must have a board of directors.

Except as provided in Section 79-11-101 et seq. or subsection (3) of this section, all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the affairs of the corporation managed under the direction of, its board.

The articles may authorize a person or persons to exercise some or all of the powers which would otherwise be exercised by a board. To the extent so authorized any such person or persons shall have the duties and responsibilities of the directors, and the directors shall be relieved to that extent from such duties and responsibilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 66, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (2) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The section as set out in the bound volume reflects this correction, which was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Requirement for and duties of board of directors under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-8.01.

Applicability of this section to definition of “board” or “board of directors” for purposes of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-127.

Authority of committee of board to exercise board’s authority under this section, see § 79-11-265.

Liability of director for unlawful distribution, see § 79-11-270.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1314.